Louisiana, session 2026, HB684.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part V-C of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised
of R.S. 15:960 through 964, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART V-C. YOUTH CONTACT REDUCTION AND DIVERSION
§960. Short title
This Part shall be referred to and may be cited as the "Youth Contact
Reduction and Diversion Act".
§961. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of eighteen.
(2) "Pre-arrest diversion program" means access to mental health or
substance abuse services offered through a licensed healthcare provider, hospital,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-305 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 684
crisis receiving center, licensed clinical social worker, regional human services
district, or any other local governmental entity, district, or authority. It also means
access to resources that include but are not limited to the opportunity for the juvenile
to address or engage with the victim, restitution agreements, and educational or
family support.
§962. Mandatory pre-arrest diversion program
A.(1) When a peace officer stops or detains a juvenile and has reasonable
grounds to believe that the juvenile has committed a first-time, nonviolent
misdemeanor-grade delinquent act, the officer shall issue the juvenile a civil citation
and an opportunity to participate in a pre-arrest diversion program.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection do not apply if the officer determines
that any of the following circumstances are present:
(a) The juvenile poses an immediate danger of imminent death or serious
bodily injury to himself, the officer, or any member of the public.
(b) The juvenile is in possession of, uses, or threatens to use a deadly
weapon.
B. A civil citation that is issued pursuant to this Section shall be resolved
within ninety days and shall not be considered any of the following:
(1) An arrest as defined in Code of Criminal Procedure Article 201.
(2) A summons as defined in Code of Criminal Procedure Article 208.
(3) A delinquency adjudication or a criminal conviction.
(4) Data or information for the purposes of submission to any criminal
database.
C. No fines, fees, or court costs shall be assessed against a juvenile who has
been referred to a pre-arrest diversion program.
§963. Reporting
All law enforcement agencies shall submit a report the legislature with annual
data on juvenile stops or detentions, citations, arrests, demographics, tract location,
completion rates, and recidivism.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-305 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 684
§964. Rulemaking
The Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of
Criminal Justice and the Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate and adopt
all rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as may
be necessary to implement the provisions of this Part.
Section 2. The report prescribed in R.S. 15:963 as enacted by Section 1 of this Act
shall be submitted no later than December 31, 2027, and annually thereafter.
Section 3. The administrative regulations required by R.S. 15:964 as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act shall be promulgated and adopted no later than December 31, 2026.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.